Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201781-2,270.01
Eggs.

Any person who for remuneration packs and sells, offers for sale, barters, or otherwise provides eggs for human consumption shall comply with all applicable requirements set forth in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department and shall establish the source of the eggs by labeling the eggs with a packer identification number assigned by the department or the United States Department of Agriculture.

Laws 2017, LB134, § 8.
August 24, 2017